California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(6) A requirement that the housing sponsor notify the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee or its designee if there is a determination by the Internal Revenue Service that the project is not in compliance with Section 42(g) of the Internal Revenue Code,
 relating to qualified low-income housing project.

(7) A requirement that the housing sponsor, as security for the performance of the housing sponsor’s obligations under the regulatory agreement, assign the housing sponsor’s interest in rents that it receives from the project, provided that until there is a default under the regulatory agreement, the housing sponsor is entitled to collect and retain the rents.

(8) A provision that the remedies available in the event of a default under the regulatory agreement that is not cured within a reasonable cure period include, but are not limited to, allowing any of the parties designated to enforce the regulatory agreement to collect all rents with respect to the project; taking possession of the project and operating the project in accordance with the regulatory agreement until the enforcer determines the housing sponsor is in a position
 to operate the project in accordance with the regulatory agreement; applying to any court for specific performance; securing the appointment of a receiver to operate the project; or any other relief as may be appropriate.

(j) (1) The committee shall allocate the housing credit on a regular basis consisting of two or more periods in each calendar year during which applications may be filed and considered. The committee shall establish application filing deadlines, the maximum percentage of federal and state low-income housing tax credit ceiling that may be allocated by the committee in that period, and the approximate date on which allocations shall be made. If the enactment of federal or state law, the adoption of rules or regulations, or other similar events prevent the use of two allocation periods, the committee may reduce the number of periods and adjust the filing deadlines, maximum percentage of credit allocated, and
 allocation dates.

(2) The committee shall adopt a qualified allocation plan, as provided in Section 42(m)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to plans for allocation of credit among projects. In adopting this plan, the committee shall comply with the provisions of Sections 42(m)(1)(B) and 42(m)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified allocation plan and relating to certain selection criteria must be used, respectively.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 42(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to responsibilities of housing credit agencies, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall allocate housing credits in accordance with the qualified allocation plan and regulations, which shall include the following provisions:

(A) All housing sponsors, as defined by paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (a), shall demonstrate at the time the application is filed with the committee that the project meets the following threshold requirements:

(i) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate there is a need and demand for low-income housing in the community or region for which it is proposed.

(ii) The project’s proposed financing, including tax credit proceeds, shall be sufficient to complete the project and that the proposed operating income shall be adequate to operate the project for the extended use period.

(iii) The project shall have enforceable financing commitments, either construction or permanent financing, for at least 50 percent of the total estimated financing of the project.

(iv) The housing sponsor shall have and maintain control of the site for
 the project.

(v) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate that the project complies with all applicable local land use and zoning ordinances.

(vi) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate that the project development team has the experience and the financial capacity to ensure project completion and operation for the extended use period.

(vii) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate the amount of tax credit that is necessary for the financial feasibility of the project and its viability as a qualified low-income housing project throughout the extended use period, taking into account operating expenses, a supportable debt service, reserves, funds set aside for rental subsidies and required equity, and a development fee that does not exceed a specified percentage of the eligible basis of the project prior to inclusion of the
 development fee in the eligible basis, as determined by the committee.

(B) The committee shall give a preference to those projects satisfying all of the threshold requirements of subparagraph (A) if both of the following apply:

(i) The project serves the lowest income tenants at rents affordable to those tenants.

(ii) The project is obligated to serve qualified tenants for the longest period.

(C) In addition to the provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B), the committee shall use the following criteria in allocating housing credits:

(i) Projects serving large families in which a substantial number, as defined by the committee, of all residential units are low-income units with three or more
 bedrooms.

(ii) Projects providing single-room occupancy units serving very low income tenants.

(iii) Existing projects that are “at risk of conversion,” as defined by paragraph (6) of subdivision (c).

(iv) Projects for which a public agency provides direct or indirect long-term financial support for at least 15 percent of the total project development costs or projects for which the owner’s equity constitutes at least 30 percent of the total project development costs.

(v) Projects that provide tenant amenities not generally available to residents of low-income housing projects.

(D) Subparagraph (B) and (C) shall not apply to projects receiving an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(4) For purposes of allocating credits pursuant to this section, the committee shall not give preference to any project by virtue of the date of submission of its application except to break a tie when two or more of the projects have an equal rating.

(5) Not less than 20 percent of the low-income housing tax credits available annually under this section, Section 12206, and Section 17058 shall be set aside for allocation to rural areas as defined in Section 50199.21 of the Health and Safety Code. Any amount of credit set aside for rural areas remaining on or after October 31 of any calendar year shall be available for allocation to any eligible project. No amount of credit set aside for rural areas shall be considered available for any eligible project so long as there are eligible rural applications pending on October 31.

(k) Section 42(l) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certifications and other reports to secretary, shall be modified as follows:

The term “secretary” shall be replaced by the term “Franchise Tax Board.”

(l) In the case in which the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and succeeding years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(m) A project that received an allocation of a 1989 federal housing credit dollar amount shall be eligible to receive an allocation of a 1990 state housing credit dollar amount, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The project was not placed in service prior
 to 1990.

(2) To the extent the amendments made to this section by the Statutes of 1990 conflict with any provisions existing in this section prior to those amendments, the prior provisions of law shall prevail.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a project applying for an allocation under this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (j).

(n) The credit period with respect to an allocation of credit in 1989 by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee of which any amount is attributable to unallocated credit from 1987 or 1988 shall not begin until after December 31, 1989.

(o) The provisions of Section 11407(a) of Public Law 101-508, relating to the effective date of the extension of the low-income housing
 credit, apply to calendar years after 1989.

(p) The provisions of Section 11407(c) of Public Law 101-508, relating to election to accelerate credit, shall not apply.

(q) (1) A corporation may elect to assign any portion of any credit allowed under this section to one or more affiliated corporations for each taxable year in which the credit is allowed. For purposes of this subdivision, “affiliated corporation” has the meaning provided in subdivision (b) of Section 25110, as that section was amended by Chapter 881 of the Statutes of 1993, as of the last day of the taxable year in which the credit is allowed, except that “100 percent” is substituted for “more than 50 percent” wherever it appears in the section, as that section was amended by Chapter 881 of the Statutes of 1993, and “voting common stock” is substituted for “voting stock” wherever it appears in
 the section, as that section was amended by Chapter 881 of the Statutes of 1993.

(2) The election provided in paragraph (1):

(A) May be based on any method selected by the corporation that originally receives the credit.

(B) Shall be irrevocable for the taxable year the credit is allowed, once made.

(C) May be changed for any subsequent taxable year if the election to make the assignment is expressly shown on each of the returns of the affiliated corporations that assign and receive the credits.

(r) (1) (A) For a project that receives a preliminary reservation under this section beginning on or after January 1, 2016, a taxpayer may elect, in the manner prescribed by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, to sell all or any portion of any credit allowed, subject to subparagraph (B). The taxpayer may make the election to sell pursuant to this subdivision at any time before the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee allocates a final credit amount for the project pursuant to this section, at which point the election shall
 become irrevocable.

(B) A credit that a taxpayer elects to sell all or a portion of pursuant to this subdivision shall be sold for consideration that is not less than 80 percent of the amount of the credit.

(2) (A) The taxpayer that originally received the credit shall report to the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee within 10 days of the sale of the credit, in the form and manner specified by the California Tax Credit
 Allocation Committee, all required information regarding the purchase and sale of the credit, including the social security or other taxpayer identification number of the unrelated party or parties to whom the credit has been sold, the face amount of the credit sold, and the amount of consideration received by the taxpayer for the sale of the credit.

(B) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall provide an annual listing to the Franchise Tax Board, in a form and manner agreed upon by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the Franchise Tax Board, of the taxpayers that have sold or purchased a credit pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) A credit may be sold pursuant to this subdivision to more than one unrelated party.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, the taxpayer that originally received the
 credit that is sold pursuant to paragraph (1) shall remain solely liable for all obligations and liabilities imposed on the taxpayer by this section with respect to the credit, none of which shall apply to a party to whom the credit has been sold or subsequently transferred. Parties that purchase credits pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be entitled to utilize the purchased credits in the same manner in which the taxpayer that originally received the credit could utilize them.

(5) A taxpayer shall not sell a credit allowed by this section if the taxpayer was allowed the credit on any tax return of the taxpayer.

(s) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee pursuant to this section.

(t) Any unused credit may continue to be carried forward, as provided in subdivision (l), until the credit has been exhausted.

(u) This section shall remain in effect on and after December 1, 1990, for as long as Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, remains in effect.

(v) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 1222 of the Statutes of 1993 shall apply only to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1994, except that paragraph (1) of subdivision (q), as amended, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
 1993.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 492, Sec. 3.   (AB 480)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally inoperative pursuant to subd. (u).)
-------------------------------------------

23621.

(a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax” (as defined by Section 23036) an amount equal to 10 percent of the amount of wages paid to each employee who is certified by the Employment Development Department to meet the requirements of Section 328 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

The credit under this section shall not apply to an individual unless, on or before the day on which that individual begins work for the employer, the employer:

(1) Has received a certification from the Employment Development Department, or

(2) Has requested in writing that certification from the Employment Development Department.

For purposes of this subdivision, if on or before the day on which the individual begins work for the employer, the individual has received from the Employment Development Department a written preliminary determination that he or she is a member of a targeted group, then the requirement of paragraph (1) or (2) shall be applicable on or before the fifth day on which the individual begins work for the employer.

(b) The credit under this section shall not apply to wages paid in excess of three thousand dollars ($3,000) during an taxable year by a taxpayer to the same individual. With respect to each qualified
 employee, the aggregate credit under this section shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(c) The credit under this section shall not apply to wages paid to an individual:

(1) Who is a dependent, as described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of Section 152(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, of an individual who owns, directly or indirectly, more than 50 percent in value of the outstanding stock of the taxpayer (determined with the application of Section 267(c) of the Internal Revenue Code); or

(2) Who is a dependent (as described in paragraph (9) of Section 152(a) of the Internal Revenue Code) of an individual described in paragraph (1).

(d) The credit under this section shall not apply to wages paid to an individual if, prior to the hiring date
 of that individual, that individual had been employed by the employer at any time during which he or she was not certified by the Employment Development Department to meet the requirements of Section 328 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(e) If the certification of an employee has been revoked pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 328 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, the credit under this section shall not apply to wages paid by the employer after the date on which notice of revocation is received by the employer.

(f) The credit under this section shall be in addition to any deduction under this part to which the taxpayer may be entitled, if any.

(g) The credit provided by this section shall be applied to wages paid to each qualifying employee during the 24-month period beginning on the date the employee begins
 working for the taxpayer.

(h) (1) A taxpayer may elect to have this section not apply for any taxable year.

(2) An election under paragraph (1) for any taxable year may be made (or revoked) at any time before the expiration of the four-year period beginning on the last date prescribed by law for filing the return for that taxable year (determined without regard to extensions).

(3) An election under paragraph (1) (or revocation thereof) shall be made in any manner which the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe.

(i) (1) In the case of a successor employer referred to in Section 3306(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, the determination of the amount of the credit under this section with respect to wages paid by
 that successor employer shall be made in the same manner as if those wages were paid by the predecessor employer referred to in that section.

(2) No credit shall be determined under this section with respect to remuneration paid by an employer to an employee for services performed by that employee for another person unless the amount reasonably expected to be received by the employer for those services from that other person exceeds the remuneration paid by the employer to that employee for those services.

(j) The term “wages” shall not include either of the following:

(1) Payments defined in Section 51(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to payments for services during labor disputes.

(2) Any amounts paid or incurred to an individual who
 begins work for an employer after December 31, 1993.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23624.

(a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax” (as defined by Section 23036) an amount equal to 10 percent of the amount of wages paid or incurred during the taxable year to each prisoner who is employed in a joint venture program established pursuant to Article 1.5 of Chapter 5 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, through agreement with the Director of Corrections.

(b) The Department of Corrections shall forward annually to the
 Franchise Tax Board a list of all employers certified by the Department of Corrections as active participants in a joint venture program pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2717.1) of Chapter 5 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code. The list shall include the certified participant’s federal employer identification number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 6, 1990, by initiative Prop. 139 (the Prison Inmate Labor Initiative of 1990).)
-------------------------------------------

23626.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2026, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer that hires a qualified full-time employee and pays or incurs qualified wages attributable to work performed by the qualified full-time employee in a designated census tract or economic development area, and that receives a tentative credit reservation for that qualified full-time employee, a credit against the “tax,” as defined by Section 23036, in an amount calculated under this section.

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2026, the designated census tract or economic development area requirements shall not apply to a qualified taxpayer described in
 clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14) of subdivision (b).

(3) The amount of the credit allowable under this section for a taxable year shall be equal to the product of the tentative credit amount for the taxable year and the applicable percentage for the taxable year.

(4) (A) If a qualified taxpayer relocates to a designated census tract or economic development area, the qualified taxpayer shall be allowed a credit with respect to qualified wages for each qualified full-time employee who is employed within the new location only if the qualified taxpayer provides each employee at the previous location or locations a written offer of employment at the new location in the designated census tract or economic development area with comparable compensation.

(B) For
 purposes of this paragraph, “relocates to a designated census tract or economic development area” means an increase in the number of qualified full-time employees, employed by a qualified taxpayer, within a designated census tract or tracts or economic development areas within a 12-month period in which there is a decrease in the number of full-time employees, employed by the qualified taxpayer in this state, but outside of designated census tracts or economic development areas.

(C) This paragraph does not apply to a small business.

(5) The credit allowed by this section may only be claimed on a timely filed original return of the qualified taxpayer and only with respect to a qualified full-time employee for whom the qualified taxpayer has received a tentative credit reservation.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) The “tentative credit amount” for a taxable year shall be equal to the product of the applicable credit percentage for each qualified full-time employee and the qualified wages paid by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year to that qualified full-time employee.

(2) The “applicable percentage” for a taxable year shall be equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the net increase in the total number of full-time employees employed in this state during the taxable year, determined on an annual full-time equivalent basis, as compared with the total number of full-time employees employed in this state during the base year, determined on the same basis, and the denominator of which shall be the total number of qualified full-time employees employed in this state during the taxable year. The applicable percentage shall not exceed 100 percent.

(3) The “applicable credit percentage” means the credit percentage for the calendar year during which a qualified full-time employee was first employed by the qualified taxpayer. The applicable credit percentage for all calendar years shall be 35 percent.

(4) “Base year” means the 2013 taxable year, or in the case of a qualified taxpayer who first hires a qualified full-time employee in a taxable year beginning on or after January 2015, the taxable year immediately preceding the taxable year in which the qualified full-time employee was hired.

(5) “Acquired” includes any gift, inheritance, transfer incident to divorce, or any other transfer, whether or not for consideration.

(6) “Annual full-time equivalent” means either of the following:

(A) In the case of a full-time employee paid hourly qualified wages, “annual full-time equivalent” means the total number of hours worked for the qualified taxpayer by the employee (not to exceed 2,000 hours per employee) divided by 2,000.

(B) In the case of a salaried full-time employee, “annual full-time equivalent” means the total number of weeks worked for the qualified taxpayer by the employee divided by 52.

(7) “Designated census tract” means a census tract within the state that is determined by the Department of Finance to have a civilian unemployment rate that is within the top 25 percent of all census tracts within the state and has a poverty rate within the top 25 percent of all census tracts within the state, as prescribed in Section 13073.5 of the Government Code.

(8) “Economic development area” means either of the following:

(A) A former enterprise zone. For purposes of this section, “former enterprise zone” means an enterprise zone designated and in effect as of December 31, 2011, any enterprise zone designated during 2012, and any revision of an enterprise zone prior to June 30, 2013, under former Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 7070) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, as in effect on December 31, 2012, excluding any census tract within an enterprise zone that is identified by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 13073.5 of the Government Code as a census tract within the lowest quartile of census tracts with the lowest civilian unemployment and poverty.

(B) A local agency military base recovery area designated as of the effective date of the act
 adding this subparagraph, in accordance with Section 7114 of the Government Code.

(9) “Electric airplane manufacturing” means manufacturing of electric airplanes that would be classified under Code 3364 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.

(10) “Lithium production” means lithium mining and manufacturing described in Codes 212390 or 325180 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.

(11) “Manufacturing of lithium batteries” means the manufacturing described in Code 335910 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.

(12) “Minimum wage” means the wage established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(13) (A) “Qualified full-time employee” means an individual who meets all of the following requirements:

(i) (I) Performs at least 50 percent of their services for the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year in a designated census tract or economic development area.

(II) This clause does not apply to employees of a qualified taxpayer described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14).

(ii) Receives starting wages that are at least 150 percent of the minimum wage or at least
 100 percent of the minimum wage for employees of a qualified taxpayer described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14).

(iii) Is hired by the qualified taxpayer on or after January 1, 2014.

(iv) Is hired by the qualified taxpayer after the date the Department of Finance determines that the census tract referred to in clause (i) is a designated census tract or that the census tracts within a former enterprise zone are not census tracts with the lowest civilian unemployment and poverty.

(v) Satisfies either of the following conditions:

(I) Is paid qualified wages by the qualified taxpayer for services not less than an average of 35 hours per week.

(II) Is a
 salaried employee and was paid compensation during the taxable year for full-time employment, within the meaning of Section 515 of the Labor Code, by the qualified taxpayer.

(vi) Upon commencement of employment with the qualified taxpayer, satisfies any of the following conditions:

(I) Was unemployed for the six months immediately preceding employment with the qualified taxpayer. In the case of an individual who completed a program of study at a college, university, or other postsecondary educational institution, received a baccalaureate, postgraduate, or professional degree, and was unemployed for the six months immediately preceding employment with the qualified taxpayer, that individual must have completed that program of study at least 12 months prior to the individual’s commencement of employment with the qualified taxpayer.

(II) Is a veteran who separated from service in the Armed Forces of the United States within the 12 months preceding commencement of employment with the qualified taxpayer.

(III) Was a recipient of the credit allowed under Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to earned income, as applicable for federal purposes, for the previous taxable year.

(IV) Is an ex-offender previously convicted of a felony.

(V) Is a recipient of either CalWORKs, in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 11250) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or general assistance, in accordance with Section 17000.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) An individual
 may only be considered a qualified full-time employee for the period of time commencing with the date the individual is first employed by the qualified taxpayer and ending 60 months thereafter.

(14) (A) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:

(i) A corporation engaged in a trade or business within designated census tract or economic development area that, during the taxable year, pays or incurs qualified wages.

(ii) A person or entity engaged in semiconductor manufacturing or semiconductor research and development that, upon requesting a tentative credit reservation, self-certifies and provides verification, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, that they intend to apply or have applied for federal funding pursuant to Sections 101 to 106, inclusive, of, or intend
 to claim or have claimed the credit pursuant to Section 107 of, Division A of the federal Creating Helpful Incentives to Produce Semiconductors (CHIPS) Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-167), and that pays or incurs qualified wages during the taxable year.

(iii) A person or entity engaged in electric airplane manufacturing that, upon requesting a tentative credit reservation, self-certifies and provides verification, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, that they have received a sales and use tax exclusion pursuant to Section 6010.8 for an electric vertical takeoff and landing (eVTOL) manufacturer and that pays or incurs qualified wages during the taxable year.

(iv) A person or entity engaged in lithium production that, upon requesting a tentative credit reservation, self-certifies and provides verification, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax
 Board, that they are a producer, as defined by Section 47002, who pays the tax imposed by Part 25 (commencing with Section 47000) for the taxable year and that pays or incurs qualified wages during the taxable year.

(v) (I) A person or entity engaged in manufacturing of lithium batteries that, upon requesting a tentative credit reservation, self-certifies and provides verification, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, that their primary business is lithium battery manufacturing and that pays or incurs qualified wages during the taxable year.

(II) For purposes of this clause, “primary business” means 50 percent or more of their gross income is derived from lithium battery manufacturing.

(B) In the case of any pass-thru entity, the determination of whether a taxpayer is a
 qualified taxpayer under this section shall be made at the entity level and any credit under this section or Section 17053.73 shall be allowed to the pass-thru entity and passed through to the partners and shareholders in accordance with applicable provisions of this part or Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001). For purposes of this subdivision, the term “pass-thru entity” means any partnership or “S” corporation.

(C) “Qualified taxpayer” shall not include any of the following:

(i) Employers that provide temporary help services, as described in Code 561320 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 edition.

(ii) Employers that provide retail trade services, as described in Sector 44-45 of the North American Industry
 Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 edition.

(iii) Employers that are primarily engaged in providing food services, as described in Code 711110, 722511, 722513, 722514, or 722515 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 edition.

(iv) Employers that are primarily engaged in services as described in Code 713210, 721120, or 722410 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 edition.

(v) (I) An employer that is a sexually oriented business.

(II) For purposes of this clause:

(ia) “Sexually oriented business” means a nightclub, bar, restaurant, or similar commercial enterprise that provides for an audience of two or more individuals live nude entertainment or live nude performances where the nudity is a function of everyday business operations and where nudity is a planned and intentional part of the entertainment or performance.

(ib) “Nude” means clothed in a manner that leaves uncovered or visible, through less than fully opaque clothing, any portion of the genitals or, in the case of a female, any portion of the breasts below the top of the areola of the breasts.

(D) Subparagraph (C) shall not apply to a taxpayer that is a “small business.”

(15) “Qualified wages” means those wages subject to withholding pursuant to Division
 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code that meet all of the following requirements:

(A) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii) or (iii), that portion of wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year to each qualified full-time employee that exceeds 150 percent of minimum wage, but does not exceed 350 percent of the minimum wage.

(ii) (I) In the case of a qualified full-time employee employed in a designated pilot area, that portion of wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year to each qualified full-time employee that exceeds ten dollars ($10) per hour or an equivalent amount for salaried employees, but does not exceed 350 percent of the minimum wage. For qualified full-time employees described in the preceding sentence, clause (ii) of subparagraph (A)
 of paragraph (13) is modified by substituting “ten dollars ($10) per hour or an equivalent amount for salaried employees” for “150 percent of the minimum wage.”

(II) For purposes of this clause:

(ia) “Designated pilot area” means an area designated as a designated pilot area by the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.

(ib) Areas that may be designated as a designated pilot area are limited to areas within a designated census tract or an economic development area with average wages less than the statewide average wages, based on information from the Labor Market Division of the Employment Development Department, and areas within a designated census tract or an economic development area based on high poverty or high unemployment.

(ic) The total number of designated pilot areas that may be designated is limited to five, one or more of which must be an area within five or fewer designated census tracts within a single county based on high poverty or high unemployment or an area within an economic development area based on high poverty or high unemployment.

(id) The designation of a designated pilot area shall be applicable for a period of four calendar years, commencing with the first calendar year for which the designation of a designated pilot area is effective. The applicable period of a designated pilot area may be extended, in the sole discretion of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, for an additional period of up to three calendar years. The applicable period, and any extended period, shall not extend beyond December 31, 2020.

(III) The designation of an area as a
 designated pilot area and the extension of the applicable period of a designated pilot area shall be at the sole discretion of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development and shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(iii) For qualified full-time employees of a qualified taxpayer described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14), that portion of wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year to each qualified full-time employee that exceeds 100 percent of minimum wage, but does not exceed 350 percent of the minimum wage.

(B) Wages paid or incurred during the 60-month period beginning with the first day the qualified full-time employee commences employment with the qualified taxpayer. In the case of any employee who is reemployed, including regularly occurring seasonal increase, in
 the trade or business operations of the qualified taxpayer, this reemployment shall not be treated as constituting commencement of employment for purposes of this section.

(C) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (m), qualified wages shall not include any wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer on or after the date that the Department of Finance’s redesignation of designated census tracts is effective, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), so that a census tract is no longer determined to be a designated census tract.

(16) “Seasonal employment” means employment by a qualified taxpayer that has regular and predictable substantial reductions in trade or business operations.

(17) “Semiconductor manufacturing or semiconductor research and development” means manufacturing described in
 Code 3344 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.

(18) (A) “Small business” means a trade or business that has aggregate gross receipts, less returns and allowances reportable to this state, of less than two million dollars ($2,000,000) during the previous taxable year.

(B) (i) For purposes of this paragraph, “gross receipts, less returns and allowances reportable to this state,” means the sum of the gross receipts from the production of business income, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 25120, and the gross receipts from the production of nonbusiness income, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 25120.

(ii) In the case of any trade or business activity conducted by
 a partnership or an “S” corporation, the limitations set forth in subparagraph (A) shall be applied to the partnership or “S” corporation and to each partner or shareholder.

(iii) For taxpayers that are required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, the dollar amount specified in subparagraph (A) shall apply to the aggregate gross receipts of all taxpayers that are required to be or authorized to be included in a combined report.

(C) (i) “Small business” shall not include a sexually oriented business.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph:

(I) “Sexually oriented business” means a nightclub, bar, restaurant, or similar commercial enterprise
 that provides for an audience of two or more individuals live nude entertainment or live nude performances where the nudity is a function of everyday business operations and where nudity is a planned and intentional part of the entertainment or performance.

(II) “Nude” means clothed in a manner that leaves uncovered or visible, through less than fully opaque clothing, any portion of the genitals or, in the case of a female, any portion of the breasts below the top of the areola of the breasts.

(19) An individual is “unemployed” for any period for which the individual is all of the following:

(A) Not in receipt of wages subject to withholding under Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code for that period.

(B) Not a self-employed individual
 (within the meaning of Section 401(c)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to self-employed individual) for that period.

(C) Not a registered full-time student at a high school, college, university, or other postsecondary educational institution for that period.
